dict-hi_IN/hi_IN.dic
अ/51
अट्ठासी/31
अड़सठ/31
अधुना/193
अनुकूल/50
अपना/26,30
अबोधगम्य/36
अभिन्न/193
अभियंता/34
अभिलेख/51
अराजक/50
अवहेलना/33
अशुद्ध/50
अष्टम/28
अंगाधीश/36
अँखुआना/6
अँगीठा/24,32
अँगूठा/24,32,36
अँगोछा/24,32
अँजोरा/24,32
अँदरसा/32
अँधियारा/24,32
अँधेरा/24,32
आ/51
आकस्मिक/50
आचरण/94,95
आडू/41
आधुनिक/193
आना/6
आने_वाला/30,32
आप/97,98,99
आपत्ति/39
आरती/37
आवश्यक/191
आश्रय/51
आसूचना/33
आहुति/39
इकत्तीस/31
इक्यानबे/31
इच्छा/53
इन/92,93,98
इल्ताफ़/35
इस/96
इंद्रायुध/36
उकडूँ/41
उच्च/50
उजड़/8
उड़ने_वाला/30,32
उत्कृष्ट/193
उद्योगपति/40
उन/92,93,98
उनसठ/31
उन्यासी/31
उपयुक्त/50
उपराष्ट्रपति/40
उपसमिति/39
उबकाई/38
उस/96
ऊँचाई/38
ऋण/51
एक/191
ऐसा/25,26,30
ऑफिस/94,95
ओट/8
ओवरड्राफ़्ट/36
ओँधा/7
ककड़ी/37
कछवाहा/32
कठुआना/6
कनिष्ठ/193
कमल/101,102,103
कमाई/38
कर/51
करतूत/35
करना/6
करोड़पति/40
कर्मशाला/33
कवि/40,191
कसौटी/37
का/25,26,30
कार्य/52
कार्यसमिति/39
कार्रवाई/38
किटकिट/9
किस/96
कुएँ/94,95
कुट्टू/41
कुठाराघात/36
कुलपति/40
कुलबुल/9
कुलाधिपति/40
कुहक/35
कुंजी/37
कूचा/32
कूज/8
कृपण/36,191
कैसा/25,26,30
कंचनिया/33
खदबद/9
खरिदवा/7
खाई/38
खांसी/37
ख़िज़ाँ/35
ख़ूनाब/36
खे/5
खेप/8
खेल/50
खो/2
खोज/52
खंडला/32
गटागट/9
ग़लतफ़हमी/37
गश्त/94,95
गहराई/38
गाने_वाला/30,32
गारंटी/52
गिरा/7
गीतप्रिया/33
गुडग़ड/9
गुडनाइट/35
गुरु/41
गुरु/41,193
गुँज/8
गोभी/37
घनघन/9
घपचिआना/6
घुघुआना/6
घैया/32
चक्रीवान/36
चढ़ाई/38
चतुर्थ/28
चतुर्दश/28
चनक/8
चमकवा/7
चरचर/9
चाभी/37
चालीस/31
चिकनाई/38
चिक्की/94,95
चिनाब/35
चुआना/6
चुचुआना/6
चुभो/1
चुरमुर/9
चू/4
चूक/52
चूड़ामणि/40
चेप/8
चौगोशिया/33
चौथा/26,30
चौरासी/31
छठा/26,30
छरछर/9
छलका/7
छवि/39
छाछठ/31
छुछुआना/6
छू/4
छोटा/32
छोटू/41
छोल/8
छँटाई/52
जनशक्ति/39
ज़मानत/35
जम्हाई/38
जयंती/37
जाना/6
जारी/52
जिज्ञासा/53
जिन/92,93,98
जिस/96
जी/3
जीमूत/36
जुड़ा/7
जैसा/25,26,30
झझकार/35
झड़झड़/9
झाड़ू/41
झँकरा/7
टरटर/9
टाइप/52
टाँका/32
टिक/8
टैंट/94,95
ठगविद्या/33
ठँसा/7
डपट/35
डायरी/37
डुबो/1
ढो/2
तड़ातड़/9
तनहाई/38
तराशवा/7
तल/8
तल्लीन/50
ताज़ीर/35
तारबाबू/41
तालाब/94,95
तालिब/36
तिथि/39
तिरानबे/31
तीव्र/193
तीसरा/26,30
तुझ/27,28,98
तुम/90,92,97,98,99
तुर्रा/32
तू/90,97
तृतीय/29
तैसा/25,26,30
तैंतीस/31
त्रयोदश/28
था/24,26,30
दरिद्र/36,191
दशम/28
दाई/38
दाता/34
दिला/7
दुखांतिका/33
दूसरा/26,30
दृढ़/193
दे/5
देना/6
देने_वाला/30,32
देवता/34
देवी/37
दोषारोपण/36
द्वादश/28
द्वितीय/29
धकाधक/9
धागा/32
धो/2
धँधुआना/6
नदी/94,95
नध/8
नलिका/33
नवम/28
नस/35
नागरिक/36,191
नाना/34
निखट्टू/41
निज/193
निधि/39
निबटा/7
निम्नवर्ग/36
निराशा/53
निरंकुश/50
निर्माता/34
निश्चित/193
निष्क्रिय/191
नीलाम/52
नृपति/40
नेता/34
न्यायाधिपति/40
पचास/31
पति/40
पतिआना/6
परचा/32
परछाई/38
परामर्श/51
परिया/33
परिष्/52
परीक्षाधीन/36
पहला/26,30
पहेली/37
पाण्डुलिपि/39
पान/94,95
पाने_वाला/30,32
पिट्ठू/41
पिता/34
पिरो/1
पी/3
पुकरवा/7
पूर/8
पैंतालीस/31
पो/2
पंचम/28
प्रचंड/193
प्रजाति/39
प्रतिपूजा/32
प्रतिमा/33
प्रतिशत/50
प्रथम/29
प्रपत्र/51
प्रमाण/52
प्राप्त/52
फगुआना/6
फ़र्द/35
फ़ारस/36
फ़ार्म/51
फ़ार्म/94,95
बकरी/37
बजबज/9
बजाने_वाला/30,32
बधाई/38
बधिर/36,191
बया/7
बलि/39
बस/94,95
बानबे/31
बारजा/32
बालचंद्रिका/33
बिक्री/52
बिन्दु/41
बिसाह/8
बुआना/6
बृहत्/193
बृहस्पति/40
बेचने_वाला/30,32
बेनी/94,95
बो/2
भकुआना/6
भांजी/37
भिगो/1
भिजवा/7
भूख/35
भूपति/40
भ्राता/34
मत्त/50
मनोभावना/33
मरतबा/32
मरमर/9
मरम्मत/52
मानव/36,191
मामू/41
मिसिल/36
मुझ/27,28,98
मुरली/94,95
मूर्त्ति/39
मूस/8
मेरा/25,26,30
मैं/97
मंजूरी/51
मँजा/7
यमुना/32
यह/91
योग्य/191
योग्य/50
रक्तिमा/33
रश्मि/39
रसोई/38
राष्ट्रपति/40
राष्ट्रपरिषद/35
रिकॉर्ड/52
रो/2
रोटी/37
रंग/94,95
रंगने_वाला/30,32
रंजना/103
लखपति/40
लघु/193
लट्टू/41
लिपि/39
ले/5
लेना/6
लेने_वाला/30,32
वनस्पति/40
वयस्क/36,191
वरमाला/32
वर्गचेतना/33
वह/91
वायव्य/36
विपरीत/50
विषमलैंगिक/191
विषयवस्तु/41
वृत्ति/39
वैसा/25,26,30
शालीन/191
शिष्ट/193
शीतांशु/41
शुद्ध/50
शुभकामना/33
शौकत/35
श्याम/102
षष्ठ/28
सकर/8
सच्चाई/38
सजनी/37
सजवा/7
सताने_वाला/30,32
सत्तर/31
सद्गुरु/41
सप्तम/28
सफ़ाई/94,95
सब/96
सभापति/40
सभ्य/191
समन्वय/52
समर्थ/50
सम्पदा/32
सरल/193
सा/25,26,30
साफिक्स/36
सी/3
सीता/101
सुनने_वाला/30,32
सुलभ/50
सूई/38
सेतु/41
सैंतालीस/31
सो/2
संवाद/51
संवाददाता/34
संस्कृति/39
संस्वीकृति/51
सँजो/1
स्कूटर/94,95
स्थिर/191
स्वागत/52
स्वेच्छा/53
हम/90,97,98,99
हिचकिच/9
हिमाकत/35
हुमक/8
हो/2
